Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6002
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Insurers and Health Organizations Risk-Based Capital Act, the definitions found in sections 44-6003 to 44-6014 shall be used.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 14;

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 33;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 4.